Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 5. Organization Expenses

§ 41-7-501.
Warrants for expense of survey authorized.

The duly appointed, qualified and acting commissioners of an irrigation district, having complied with the provisions of W.S.

41-7-302

, are hereby authorized to issue warrants of said district bearing interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum up to the amount set by the judge of the district court of the judicial district wherein such district was organized for the purpose of making the surveys necessary to present their first report as provided in W.S.

41-7-305

, and to defray other necessary expenses of the district, prior to the said first report and the assessment of benefits, upon complying with the procedure set out hereinafter.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 22, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-901; W.S. 1957, § 41-316.

Cross references. —

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

§ 41-7-502.
Petition for authority to issue warrants; notice of hearing; objections.

Whenever the commissioners of an irrigation district, after their appointment and qualification, shall wish to avail themselves of the provisions of W.S.

41-7-501

, they shall file in the district court wherein such district was organized, a petition for authority to issue interest-bearing warrants, setting out the necessity for such issuance, the amounts of warrants to be issued and the purpose thereof; the judge of said court shall thereupon, by order, set a date for hearing said petition and notice of such hearing, setting out briefly the purpose thereof, shall be published for one (1) consecutive week in a newspaper of general circulation in the county wherein the district or the greater portion thereof is situate, the last publication of said notice shall be at least ten (10) days prior to the date set for said hearing and any protests or objections to the said petition must be in writing, setting out the grounds of such protest or objection, signed and verified by the protestant or objector, and filed in the proceeding at least five (5) days prior to the date set for said hearing.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 22, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 71-902; W.S. 1957, § 41-317.

§ 41-7-503.
Petition for authority to issue warrants; hearing generally; decree generally; appeal.

Upon the date set for the hearing of said petition, the judge shall hear evidence in support thereof and in support of any protests or objections properly filed and shall hear and determine all proper issues presented by said petition and any protests or objections which there may be and the judge shall enter his order in accord with such evidence; if, in the discretion of the court the petition should be granted he shall make his order authorizing the issuance of such interest-bearing warrants, setting the amount of such warrants which may be issued and the purpose for which such warrants may be used; such order will become final and conclusive unless appealed from within thirty (30) days of the date of its entry.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 22, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 71-903; W.S. 1957, § 41-318.

§ 41-7-504.
Effect of decree; reference to be made on warrants.

Said order shall be the authority of the said commissioners and reference shall be made thereto on all warrants issued showing the amount so authorized and the total issued to the time thereof.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 22, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 71-904; W.S. 1957, § 41-319.

§ 41-7-505.
Assessment roll when assessments not yet approved or confirmed; equalization of assessments; levy.

It shall be the duty of the commissioners of each irrigation district in which an assessment for benefits and construction has not theretofore been approved or confirmed by the court to prepare an assessment roll of said district which shall contain the name of the owner, together with a description of each tract, lot and easement of land within said district, together with the aggregate assessment levied or assessed against each lot, tract and easement of land therein. All such assessments to meet the authorized expenditures of said district shall be apportioned among the various landowners owning lands within said irrigation district in such manner that each irrigable acre of land, as returned for assessment purposes by the county assessor, and as thereafter amended or confirmed by the county board of equalization, shall bear an equal part or portion of the total of said assessments as its assessed irrigable area, as returned by the county assessor, bears to the total irrigable area of land, returned by the county assessor, within said irrigation district. Such assessment roll of the district shall be signed by the commissioners thereof and verified by any one (1) of them. On or before the fourth Monday in May of each year the commissioners of any such irrigation district shall deliver to the county commissioners of the county having jurisdiction of such irrigation district, the assessment roll of said district by filing the same in the office of the proper county clerk. The county commissioners of said county, acting as a board of equalization shall proceed to hear any and all complaints or objections thereto and correct, equalize and complete the same in such manner that said assessments listed in said assessment roll shall be equitably and ratably apportioned equally among the various irrigable lands included within said irrigation district. At the time of making the requisite tax levy for county purposes, the county commissioners of said county shall levy and assess against each tract, lot and easement of land, the respective amounts levied and assessed against the same upon said assessment roll as revised and corrected by them. Thereupon the county commissioners shall certify to and deliver said assessment roll to the county assessor of said county and in case the territory embraced in said district is located in two (2) or more counties, separate assessment rolls and proceedings shall be had and taken in each separate county, as required herein, but the assessment rate per irrigable acre as determined by the county commissioners having jurisdiction in the county in which the court proceedings are handled for said district shall be the rate per irrigable acre used by the county commissioners in all other counties in said district. Upon receipt of said assessment roll, the assessor of the county embracing any of the lands of said district shall extend upon the tax rolls of such county, the respective amounts levied against each lot, tract and easement of land as shown by said assessment roll of said district.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 22, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 71-905; W.S. 1957, § 41-320.

Cross references. —

For duties of county commissioners as county board of equalization generally, see §

39-11-102

.1.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1937, ch. 22, § 6, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.